District of Columbia statutes.
3-1251.11

Maintenance of records.

(a)

Records shall be confidential and maintained in a locked file in the office of the Board.

(b)

A nurse’s records shall be destroyed 2 years after the nurse’s satisfactory discharge from the Program.

May 1, 2001, D.C. Law 13-297, § 12, 48 DCR 2036